Georgia, session 2025_26, HB855.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
An Act to authorize the governing authority of the City of Thomasville to levy an excise tax
pursuant to subsection (b) of Code Section 48-13-51 of the O.C.G.A., approved April 27,
2016 (Ga. L. 2016, p. 3799), is amended by revising paragraph (1) of Section 3 as follows:
"(1) In each fiscal year during which a tax is collected pursuant to paragraph (2) of
subsection (b) of Code Section 48-13-51 of the O.C.G.A., an amount equal to not less
than 50 percent of the total amount of taxes collected that exceeds the amount of taxes
that would be collected at the rate to 5 percent shall be expended for promoting tourism,
conventions, and trade shows by the destination marketing organization designated by the
City of Thomasville or such other entity authorized to administer and expend the
H. B. 855
- 1 -

LC 47 3583/AP
proceeds of such tax under a contract authorized by paragraph (2) of subsection (e) of
Code Section 48-13-51 of the O.C.G.A.; and"
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 855
- 2 -